Arkansas, session 2025, HB1786.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. Arkansas Code § 6-60-214 is amended to add additional
subsections to read as follows:
(j) A soldier or airman of the Arkansas National Guard attending a
private institution of higher education may receive a tuition benefit under
this section up to an amount equal to the amount that the soldier or airman
of the Arkansas National Guard would have received under this section if he
or she were attending a state-supported college or university.
(k) As used in this section, "private institution of higher education"
means a private, nonprofit two-year or four-year college or university with
its primary headquarters located in Arkansas that is eligible to receive
Title IV federal student aid funds.
*CRH219*
04-02-2025 10:29:17 CRH219

As Engrossed: H4/2/25 HB1786

/s/Brooks


































04-02-2025 10:29:17 CRH219